Washington statutes.
RCW 18.270.060

Fees—Deposit and use.

All receipts from fees and charges or from the money generated by the rules adopted under this chapter shall be deposited into the fire protection contractor license fund created in RCW 18.160.050 and used for the purposes authorized under this chapter.

[ 2007 c 435 s 7.]